Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1111
Election contest; person holding certificate of election; powers and duties.

When a contested election is pending, the person holding the certificate of election may give bond, qualify and take the office at the time specified by law, and exercise the duties of the office until the contest is decided. If the contest is decided against him or her, the court shall order him or her to give up the office to the successful party in the contest and deliver to the successful party all books, records, papers, property, and effects pertaining to the office, and the court may enforce such order by attachment or other proper legal process.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 354;

Laws 2018, LB744, § 3.

Contestant was declared elected and cause was remanded for further order of trial court hereunder. Dilsaver v. Pollard, 191 Neb. 241, 214 N.W.2d 478 (1974).